West Virginia, session 2025, HB2721.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. TRAINING, CERTIFICATION, LICENSING, PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT. §18A-3-13. Technology integration specialists. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that training a professional staff member in the process of grant writing and grant writing procedures would benefit both the school and the county board of education generally.(b) Enactment. – County boards of education shall train at least one professional staff member at each school in the county in grant writing procedures.(c) Effective date. – This section shall become effective on July 1, 2025.